Maryland, session 2025, HB0115.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
10–310.
(a) For each individual who seeks to vote, an election judge, in accordance with
instructions provided by the local board, shall:
(1) locate the individual’s name in the election register and locate the
preprinted voting authority card and then authorize the individual to vote a regular ballot;
(2) (i) if the individual’s name is not found on the election register,
search the inactive list and if the name is found, authorize the individual to vote a regular
ballot; or
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0115*

HOUSE BILL 115
(ii) if the individual’s name is not on the inactive list, refer the
individual for provisional ballot voting under § 9–404 of this article;
(3) establish the identity of the voter by requesting the voter to:
(I) state the month and day of the voter’s birth and comparing the
response to the information listed in the election register; OR
(II) PRESENT ANY OF THE FOLLOWING FORMS OF
IDENTIFICATION:
1. THE VOTER’S VOTER REGISTRATION CARD;
2. THE VOTER’S VALID MARYLAND DRIVER’S LICENSE;
OR
3. ANY IDENTIFICATION CARD THAT CONTAINS A
PHOTOGRAPH OF THE VOTER AND IS ISSUED TO THE VOTER BY A POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE, THE STATE, THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, OR ANY UNIT
OF A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE, THE STATE, OR THE FEDERAL
GOVERNMENT;
(4) (i) except if a voter’s personal information has been deemed
confidential by the local board, verify the address of the voter’s residence; or
(ii) conduct an alternative verification as established by the State
Board, if the voter’s personal information has been deemed confidential by the local board;
(5) if any changes to the voting authority card are indicated by a voter,
make the appropriate changes in information on the card or other appropriate form; and
(6) have the voter sign the voting authority card and either issue the voter
a ballot or send the voter to a machine to vote.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.